Georgia, session 2025_26, SB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
The month of April of each year is designated as 'Georgia Native Plant Month' in Georgia."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 240
- 1 -